Utah statutes.
72-5-308.   Provisions govern determinations -- Determinations effective dates.

The provisions of this part pertaining to substantive standards for acceptance of the R.S. 2477 grant shall govern the R.S. 2477 assessments of the governor or the governor's designee and the decisions of the courts to the extent that the provisions are consistent with state law, including common law, applicable as of the cut-off date.



Enacted by Chapter 293, 2003 General Session

